Washington statutes.
RCW 43.03.015

Emoluments of office for appointees to office of state legislator.

Any person appointed to fill a vacancy that may occur in either the senate or house of representatives of the state legislature, prior to his or her qualification at the next succeeding regular or special session of the legislature shall be entitled to the same emoluments of office as the duly elected member whom he or she succeeded.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5005; 1967 ex.s. c 100 s 2.]

NOTES:

Eligibility of member of legislature to appointment or election to office of official whose salary was increased during legislator's term: RCW 3.58.010.